Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 3. Applications for Licenses and Permits; Fees; Taxes.
§ 4.1-233.1.
Fees on local licenses.

In addition to the state license taxes, the annual local license taxes that may be collected shall not exceed the following sums:

Manufacturer licenses. For each:

Distiller’s license and limited distiller’s license, if more than 5,000 gallons but not more than 36,000 gallons manufactured during such year, $750; if more than 36,000 gallons manufactured during such year, $1,000; and no local license shall be required for any person who manufactures not more than 5,000 gallons of alcohol or spirits, or both, during such license year;

Brewery license and limited brewery license, if not more than 500 barrels of beer manufactured during the year in which the license is granted, $250, and if more than 500 barrels manufactured during such year, $1,000;

Winery license, $50; and

Farm winery license, $50.

Wholesale licenses. For each:

Wholesale beer license, in a city, $250, and in a county or town, $75; and

Wholesale wine license, $50.

Retail licenses — mixed beverage. For each:

Mixed beverage restaurant license, granted to persons operating restaurants, including restaurants located on premises of and operated by casinos, hotels or motels, or other persons:

With a seating capacity at tables for up to 100 persons, $200;

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 100 but not more than 150 persons, $350;

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 150 persons but not more than 500 persons, $500;

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 500 persons but not more than 1,000 persons, $650; and

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 1,000 persons, $800;

Mixed beverage restaurant license for restaurants located on the premises of and operated by private, nonprofit clubs, $350;

Mixed beverage casino license, $800 plus an additional $2 for each gaming station located on the premises of the casino gaming establishment. For the purposes of this subdivision, “gaming station” means each slot machine and each casino gaming table that is in active use, as determined annually on December 31;

Mixed beverage caterer’s license, $500;

Mixed beverage limited caterer’s license, $100;

Annual mixed beverage motor sports facility license, $300;

Limited mixed beverage restaurant license:

Annual mixed beverage performing arts facility license, $300;

Bed and breakfast license, $40;

Museum license, $10;

Motor car sporting event facility license, $10;

Commercial lifestyle center license, $60; and

Annual mixed beverage special events license, $300.

Retail licenses — on-and-off-premises wine and beer. For each on-and-off premises wine and beer license issued to:

Hotels, restaurants, and clubs, in a city, $150, and in a county or town, $37.50;

Hospitals, $10;

Rural grocery stores, $37.50; and

Historic cinema houses, $20.

Retail licenses — off-premises wine and beer. For each:

Retail off-premises wine and beer license, in a city, $150, and in a county or town, $37.50;

Gourmet brewing shop license, $150; and

Confectionery license, $20.

Retail licenses — banquet, special event, and tasting licenses. For each:

Per-day event licenses. For each:

Annual licenses. For each:

Retail licenses — marketplace. For each marketplace license, $200.

Retail licenses — shipper, bottler, and related licenses. For each:

Wine and beer shipper’s license, $10; and

Bottler license, $500.

Common carriers. No local license tax shall be either charged or collected for the privilege of selling alcoholic beverages in (i) passenger trains, boats, buses, or airplanes or (ii) rooms designated by the Board of establishments of air carriers of passengers at airports in the Commonwealth for on-premises consumption only.

Merchants’ and restaurants’ license taxes. The governing body of each county, city, or town in the Commonwealth, in imposing local wholesale merchants’ license taxes measured by purchases, local retail merchants’ license taxes measured by sales, and local restaurant license taxes measured by sales, may include alcoholic beverages in the base for measuring such local license taxes the same as if the alcoholic beverages were nonalcoholic. No local alcoholic beverage license authorized by this chapter shall exempt any licensee from any local merchants’ or local restaurant license tax, but such local merchants’ and local restaurant license taxes may be in addition to the local alcoholic beverage license taxes authorized by this chapter.

The governing body of any county, city, or town, in adopting an ordinance under this section, shall provide that in ascertaining the liability of (i) a beer wholesaler to local merchants’ license taxation under the ordinance, and in computing the local wholesale merchants’ license tax on such beer wholesaler, purchases of beer up to a stated amount shall be disregarded, which stated amount shall be the amount of beer purchases which would be necessary to produce a local wholesale merchants’ license tax equal to the local wholesale beer license tax paid by such wholesaler and (ii) a wholesale wine licensee to local merchants’ license taxation under the ordinance, and in computing the local wholesale merchants’ license tax on such wholesale wine licensee, purchases of wine up to a stated amount shall be disregarded, which stated amount shall be the amount of wine purchases which would be necessary to produce a local wholesale merchants’ license tax equal to the local wholesale wine licensee license tax paid by such wholesale wine licensee.

Delivery. No county, city, or town shall impose any local alcoholic beverage license tax on any wholesaler for the privilege of delivering alcoholic beverages in the county, city, or town when such wholesaler maintains no place of business in such county, city, or town.

Application of county tax within town. Any county license tax imposed under this section shall not apply within the limits of any town located in such county, where such town imposes a town license tax on the same privilege.

(1)

With a seating capacity at tables for up to 100 persons, $100;

(2)

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 100 but not more than 150 persons, $250; or

(3)

With a seating capacity at tables for more than 150 persons, $400;

(1)

Banquet license, $5 per license granted by the Board, except for banquet licenses granted by the Board pursuant to subsection A of §

4.1-215

, which shall be $20 per license;

(2)

Mixed beverage special events license, $10 for each day of each event;

(3)

Mixed beverage club events license, $10 for each day of each event; and

(4)

Tasting license, $10.

(1)

Annual banquet license, $15;

(2)

Designated outdoor refreshment area license, $60. However, for any designated outdoor refreshment area license issued pursuant to a local ordinance, the annual fee shall be $600;

(3)

Annual mixed beverage banquet license, $75;

(4)

Equine sporting event license, $10; and

(5)

Annual arts venue event license, $10.

History.

2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 82, 390, 391; 2022, cc. 589, 590.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, effective March 11, 2021, substituted “500 barrels manufactured” for “10,000 barrels manufactured” in subdivision A 1 b.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 390 and 391, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “Designated outdoor refreshment area license, $60. However, for any designated outdoor refreshment area license issued pursuant to a local ordinance, the annual fee shall be $600” for “Local special events” in A 6 b (2).

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 589 and 590 are identical, and inserted “casinos” in subdivision A 3 a; and in subdivision A 3 c, substituted “casino license” for “restaurant license for restaurants located on the premises of and operated by a casino gaming establishment” and added the second sentence.

§ 4.1-234.
Tax on wine and other alcoholic beverages; exceptions.

In addition to the taxes imposed pursuant to Chapter 6 (§

58.1-600

et seq.) of Title 58.1, a tax of 40 cents is levied on each liter of wine sold in the Commonwealth. Additionally, on vermouth and on farm winery wines sold to consumers by the Board the state tax shall be four percent of the price charged.

There is levied on other alcoholic beverages sold by the Board a tax of 20 percent of the price charged. This subsection shall also apply to all alcoholic beverages purchased from the Board by any mixed beverage licensee.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to (i) beer, (ii) wine coolers, (iii) sales of wine by manufacturers to wholesale wine licensees for resale to retail licensees, (iv) sales, other than by or through government stores, of alcoholic beverages for manufacturing and industrial purposes, or either, (v) sales, other than by or through government stores, of alcohol for hospital and laboratory purposes, or either, (vi) alcoholic beverages shipped from the Commonwealth to points outside the Commonwealth, for resale outside the Commonwealth, (vii) alcoholic beverages shipped from the Commonwealth to consumers outside the Commonwealth for personal consumption and not for resale, and (viii) sales to any instrumentality of the federal government.

History.

1968, c. 609, § 4-98.20; 1980, c. 624, § 4-22.1; 1981, cc. 381, 407; 1982, cc. 540, 556; 1984, c. 200; 1985, cc. 222, 457; 1986, c. 130; 1993, c. 866; 2011, cc. 238, 299.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 238 and 299, are nearly identical, and made minor stylistic changes in subsections A and B, added clause C (vii), and redesignated former C (vii) as C (viii).

§ 4.1-235.
Collection; computation, distribution of tax on wine and other alcoholic beverages; refunds and adjustments.

The Board shall collect the state taxes levied pursuant to §§

4.1-213

and

4.1-234

as follows:

Collection shall be from the purchaser at the time of or prior to sale, except as to sales made to wholesale wine licensees. Wholesale wine licensees shall collect the taxes at the time of or prior to sale to retail licensees, and shall remit such taxes monthly to the Board, along with such reports as may be required by the Board, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Board.

In establishing the prices for items sold by it to persons other than wholesale licensees, the Board shall include a reasonable markup. The liter tax or 20 percent tax, as appropriate, shall then be added to the price of each container of alcoholic beverages. The four percent tax on vermouth and farm winery wines and ciders shall then be added for those products. In all cases the final price for each container may be established so as to be a multiple of five or rounded to end with a nine.

In accounting for the state tax on sales the Board shall divide the net sales for the quarter by 1.20 and multiply the result by 20 percent. As to the sale of vermouth and farm winery wine and cider, the Board shall divide the net sales for the quarter by 1.04 and multiply the result by four percent.

The amount of tax collected under this section during each quarter shall, within 50 days after the close of such quarter, be certified to the Comptroller by the Board and shall be transferred by him from the special fund described in §

4.1-116

to the general fund of the state treasury. The Board shall, not later than June 20 of every year, estimate the yield of the state tax on sales imposed by §§

4.1-213

and

4.1-234

for the quarter ending June 30 and certify the amount of such estimate to the Comptroller, whereupon the Comptroller shall, before the end of the month, transfer the amount of such estimate from the special fund described in §

4.1-116

to the general fund of the state treasury, subject to such adjustment on account of an overestimate or underestimate as may be indicated within 50 days after the close of the quarter ending on June 30.

Forty-four percent of the amount derived from the liter tax levied pursuant to §§

4.1-213

and

4.1-234

shall be transferred to the general fund and paid to the several counties, cities, and towns of the Commonwealth in proportion to their respective populations, and is appropriated for such purpose.

The counties, cities, and towns shall in no event receive from the taxes derived from the sale of wines less revenue than was received by such counties, cities, and towns for the year ending June 30, 1976.

The portion of wine liter tax and cider markup collected pursuant to §§ 4.1-213 and 4.1-234 that is attributable to the sale of wine and cider produced by a farm winery shall be deposited in the Virginia Wine Promotion Fund established pursuant to §

3.2-3005

.

Twelve percent of the amount derived from the liter tax levied shall be retained by the Board as operating revenue and distributed as provided in §

4.1-117

.

Twenty percent of the portion of tax collected pursuant to subsection B of § 4.1-234 that is attributable to the sale of spirits produced by a distiller licensee shall be deposited in the Virginia Spirits Promotion Fund established pursuant to §

3.2-3012

.

As used in this section, the term “net sales” means gross sales less refunds to customers.

The Board may make a refund or adjustment of any tax paid to it under this section when (i) the wine upon which such tax has been paid has been condemned and is not permitted to be sold in the Commonwealth, or (ii) wine is returned by a retail licensee to a wholesale wine licensee for refund in accordance with Board regulations or approval. Any claim for such refund or adjustment shall be made to the Board in the report filed with the Board by the wholesale wine licensee for the period in which such return and refund occurs.

History.

1980, c. 624, § 4-22.1; 1981, c. 407; 1982, cc. 540, 556; 1984, c. 200; 1985, cc. 222, 457; 1986, c. 130; 1993, c. 866; 2010, cc. 247, 362; 2015, cc. 4, 21; 2016, cc. 24, 140; 2022, cc. 84, 85.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 247 and 362 are identical, and inserted the fourth paragraph in subsection B and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 4 and 21 are identical and added “or rounded to end with a nine” at the end of the first paragraph in subdivision A 2.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 24 and 140 are identical, and substituted “§§

4.1-213

and

4.1-234

” for “§

4.1-234

” throughout the section; in subdivision A 2 inserted “and ciders” in the first paragraph and “and cider” in the second paragraph; in subsection B, inserted “and cider markup” and “and cider” in the fourth paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 84 and 85 are identical, and added the last paragraph in subsection B.

§ 4.1-236.
Excise tax on beer and wine coolers; payment of tax; exceptions.

There is levied on all beer and wine coolers sold in the Commonwealth an excise tax at the rate of:

Twenty-five and sixty-five hundredths cents per gallon per barrel;

Two cents per bottle on bottles of not more than seven ounces each;

Two and sixty-five hundredths cents per bottle on bottles of more than seven ounces each but not more than twelve ounces each; and

Two and twenty-two one hundredths mills per ounce per bottle on bottles of more than twelve ounces each.

The tax herein levied shall be paid by the manufacturer, bottler or wholesaler selling beer or wine coolers to licensed retailers.

Any person selling or offering for sale in the Commonwealth any beer or wine coolers purchased or obtained from any person not licensed either as a manufacturer, bottler or wholesaler under this chapter, and on which the excise tax levied has not been paid, shall pay the tax.

This section shall not apply to any manufacturer, bottler or wholesaler of any beer or wine coolers, which are:

Shipped out of the Commonwealth by such manufacturer, bottler or wholesaler for resale outside of the Commonwealth;

Sold to the United States or to any instrumentality thereof for resale to or for the use or consumption by members of the armed forces of the United States;

Sold to the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs for resale to veterans of the armed services of the United States who are hospitalized or domiciled in hospitals and homes of the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs within the geographical confines of the Commonwealth;

Shipped to a post exchange of the armed forces of the United States for resale by such post exchange, whether such post exchange is located on a United States military reservation or not;

Shipped to any instrumentality of the United States which is exempt on constitutional grounds from the excise tax levied by this section; or

Sold and delivered to foreign boats or aircraft actually engaged in foreign commerce or commerce between any ports of the United States or commerce between the United States and any of its possessions outside of the several states and the District of Columbia.The exceptions allowed in subdivisions 1, 4, and 5 of this subsection shall be applicable only if, in each case, evidence satisfactory to the Board is submitted in writing that such beer or wine coolers were so shipped.

History.

1988, c. 261, §§ 4-128, 4-129, 4-130; 1993, c. 866.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs” was twice substituted for “Veterans Administration” in subdivision D 3.

§ 4.1-237.
Refund and adjustments on excise tax on beer and wine coolers.

Whenever it is proved to the satisfaction of the Board that the tax levied pursuant to §

4.1-236

has been paid and that beer or wine coolers were or are (i) damaged, destroyed or otherwise deemed to be unsalable by reason of fire or any other providential cause before sale to the consumer, (ii) destroyed voluntarily because the beer or wine coolers were defective and after notice to and approval by the Board of such destruction or (iii) destroyed in any manner while in possession of a common, private or contract carrier, the Board shall certify such facts to the Comptroller for approval of a refund payment from the state treasury to such extent as may be proper. The manufacturer, bottler or wholesaler shall make a report thereof to the Board as a portion of the report required by §

4.1-239

.

Whenever it is proved to the satisfaction of the Board that any person has purchased beer or wine coolers which have been sold by him in such manner as to be exempt from the excise tax levied under §

4.1-236

, the Board shall certify such facts to the Comptroller for approval of a refund payment from the state treasury to such extent as may be proper.

History.

1988, c. 261, §§ 4-141, 4-142; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-238.
Bond required to secure excise tax liability on beer and wine coolers, and wine stored in bonded warehouses.

Every manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler, as a condition precedent to obtaining a license to sell beer or wine coolers to a licensed retailer, shall file a bond with the Board in such sum and with such surety as the Board deems adequate to cover the tax liability of each such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler. The sum of such bond shall be proportioned to the volume of business of each such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler, but shall in no event be less than $1,000 or more than $100,000. Such bond shall be conditioned upon the payment by such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of the tax imposed by §

4.1-236

.

Every holder of a bonded warehouse permit, issued in accordance with subdivision 13 of §

4.1-212

, as a condition to obtaining the permit, shall file a bond with the Board in such sum and with such surety as the Board deems adequate to cover the tax liability of each such permittee. The sum of such bond shall be proportioned to the volume of business of each such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler, but shall in no event be less than $1,000 or more than $10,000. Such bond shall be conditioned upon the payment by the permittee of the tax imposed by §

4.1-234

.

The Board may waive the requirement of both the surety and the bond, in cases where a manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler has previously demonstrated his financial responsibility.

Upon the termination of the bond, its guaranty or surety, the Board, upon reasonable notice to the manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler so licensed, may suspend the license so granted until such times as the required bond is filed or the proper surety or guaranty is given.

History.

1988, c. 261, § 4-138; 1993, c. 866; 2003, c. 564; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 564 inserted present subsection B and redesignated former subsections B and C as subsections C and D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “subdivision 13” for “subdivision 14” in subsection B in the first sentence.

§ 4.1-239.
Monthly reports and payment of excise tax on beer and wine coolers; filing by nonresident manufacturer; commissions.

On or before the tenth day of each month, each manufacturer, bottler, wholesaler or other person selling beer or wine coolers in the Commonwealth who is chargeable with the payment of excise taxes imposed by §

4.1-236

shall file a report under oath with the Board, on forms prescribed by the Board, showing the quantity of all beer and wine coolers manufactured, bottled or sold by such person during the preceding calendar months. Such report shall also contain any other information the Board may require. Common carriers of passengers by train or boat licensed to sell beer or wine coolers in dining cars, buffet cars, club cars or on such boats shall have thirty days from the end of each calendar month to file such reports. At the time of filing, such person shall pay the Board all excise taxes chargeable against him under the provisions of §

4.1-236

, unless the taxes have been previously paid.

In addition to the requirements of subsection A, on or before the fifteenth day of each month each nonresident manufacturer shall forward a copy of each invoice required by Board regulation or a listing of all such invoices for the preceding month to the Board as a condition of shipment into or doing business in the Commonwealth.

Any person filing the report required by this section and paying such excise tax required by subsection B of §

4.1-236

shall be allowed a commission of one percent of the amount of tax due as compensation for the expense of maintaining records and preparing reports so as to account for and remit the tax levied by §

4.1-236

. Such commission shall also be allowed as compensation for the expense, if any, of compliance with the requirements of §

4.1-238

. Such commission shall be accounted for in the form of a deduction from the amount of tax which would otherwise be due.

History.

1988, c. 261, §§ 4-131, 4-132, 4-133; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-240.
Collection of taxes and fees; service charge; storage of credit card, debit card, and automated clearinghouse information.

The Board may accept payment by any commercially acceptable means, including checks, credit cards, debit cards, and electronic funds transfers, for the taxes, penalties, or other fees imposed on a licensee in accordance with this subtitle. In addition, the Board may assess a service charge for the use of a credit or debit card. The service charge shall not exceed the amount negotiated and agreed to in a contract with the Department.

Upon the request of a license applicant or licensee, the Board may collect and maintain a record of the applicant’s or licensee’s credit card, debit card, or automated clearinghouse transfer information and use such information for future payments of taxes, penalties, other fees, or amounts due for products purchased from the Board. The Board may assess a service charge as provided in subsection A for any payments made under this subsection. The Board may procure the services of a third-party vendor for the secure storage of information collected pursuant to this subsection.

History.

2000, c. 801; 2015, c. 412.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 added the subsection A designation and substituted “accept payment by any commercially acceptable means, including checks, credit cards, debit cards, and electronic funds transfers” for “accept credit or debit cards in payment” therein; and added subsection B.